Idaho, session 2026, S1433.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Medicaid the following amounts to be expended according to the
designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
Medicaid Management Information Systems Dedicated
Fund $10,272,100 $10,272,100
CooperativeWelfare(Dedicated)
Fund 1,715,800 1,715,800
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 94,244,800 $486,000 94,730,800
TOTAL $106,232,700 $486,000 $106,718,700
II. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $16,914,400 $16,914,400
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 31,522,700 31,522,700
TOTAL $48,437,100 $48,437,100


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $33,127,700 $33,127,700
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 61,738,400 61,738,400
TOTAL $94,866,100 $94,866,100
IV. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $42,163,300 $42,163,300
CooperativeWelfare(Dedicated)
Fund 37,087,600 37,087,600
IdahoMillenniumIncome
Fund 25,000,000 25,000,000
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 125,168,800 125,168,800
TOTAL $229,419,700 $229,419,700
V. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $52,555,000 $52,555,000
CooperativeWelfare(Dedicated)
Fund 29,518,500 29,518,500
TOTAL $82,073,500 $82,073,500
VI. HOSPITAL ASSESSMENT:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment
Fund $601,781,000 $601,781,000
GRAND TOTAL $106,232,700 $1,057,063,400 $1,163,296,100
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-


sion of Medicaid is hereby reduced by the following amounts according to the
designated programs from trustee and benefit payments from the listed funds
for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
I. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $103,577,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,445,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 85,532,500
TOTAL $190,555,300
II. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $4,172,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 4,958,600
TOTAL $9,131,300
III. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $115,270,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,023,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 140,359,600
TOTAL $256,653,000
IV. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund $46,676,200
Hospital Assessment Fund 25,064,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,525,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 140,335,000
TOTAL $213,601,700
GRAND TOTAL $669,941,300
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 209, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Medicaid the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund $1,535,300 $486,000 $2,021,300
II. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $28,468,900 $28,468,900
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 18,049,600 18,049,600
TOTAL $46,518,500 $46,518,500
III. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $40,277,100 $40,277,100
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 25,536,000 25,536,000
TOTAL $65,813,100 $65,813,100
IV. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $22,938,000 $22,938,000
MedicaidBudgetStabilization
Fund 8,507,700 8,507,700
CooperativeWelfare(Dedicated)
Fund 15,165,200 15,165,200
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 19,936,800 19,936,800
TOTAL $66,547,700 $66,547,700


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
V. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $908,400 $908,400
VI. HOSPITAL ASSESSMENT:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment
Fund $601,781,000 $601,781,000
GRAND TOTAL $1,535,300 $782,054,700 $783,590,000
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Medicaid in Section 1, Chapter 209, Laws of 2025, is hereby reduced by
the following amounts according to the designated programs from trustee and
benefit payments from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
I. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $103,577,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,445,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 85,532,500
TOTAL $190,555,300
II. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $4,172,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 4,958,600
TOTAL $9,131,300
III. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $115,270,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,023,000


Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 140,359,600
TOTAL $256,653,000
IV. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment Fund $25,064,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated) Fund 1,525,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 193,415,900
TOTAL $220,006,400
GRAND TOTAL $676,346,000
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.